Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.240

Conditions and contracts of employment—Supplemental contracts, when—Continuing contract provisions not applicable to.

No certificated employee shall be required to perform duties not described in the contract unless a new or supplemental contract is made, except that in an unexpected emergency the board of directors or school district administration may require the employee to perform other reasonable duties on a temporary basis.

No supplemental contract shall be subject to the continuing contract provisions of this title.

[ 1990 c 33 s 393; 1985 c 341 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.67.074, 28.67.074.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.

RCW 28A.405.240 not applicable to contract renewal of school superintendent: RCW 28A.400.010.